Massachusetts, session 194th, S2546.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 31. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Disposable menstrual products”, products used by a menstruating individual including,
but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons and underwear liners.
“Menstruating individual”, a person who menstruates.
(b) Any provider of temporary housing assistance, including, but not limited to, a family
shelter, a shelter for adults, a hotel used for emergency shelter, an emergency apartment, a
domestic violence shelter, a runaway and homeless youth shelter or a safe house for refugees,
shall provide disposable menstrual products at no cost to a menstruating individual. The
of 3

disposable menstrual products shall be made available in a readily accessible location and in a
manner that minimizes any stigmatization the individual seeking such products.
SECTION 2. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 3 the following section:-
Section 3A. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“Disposable menstrual products”, products used by a menstruating individual including,
but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons and underwear liners.
“Menstruating individual”, a person who menstruates.
(b) Every elementary and secondary public school shall provide disposable menstrual
products to students at no cost. The disposable menstrual products shall be made available in
readily accessible locations, including, but not limited to, in restrooms for menstruating
individuals, and in a manner that minimizes any stigmatization of individual seeking such
products
SECTION 3. Chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 172. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Administrator”, the keeper of a lockup facility under section 35 of chapter 40, the
superintendent of a correctional facility under chapter 125, a sheriff or special sheriff in charge
of a jail, house of correction or regional lockup facility under chapter 126, the colonel of state
of 3

police or any other official who oversees a facility used for the detention of persons arrested and
held in custody or serving a sentence.
“Disposable menstrual products”, products used by a menstruating individual including,
but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons and underwear liners.
“Menstruating individual”, a person who menstruates.
(b) The administrator shall provide disposable menstrual products to menstruating
individuals held or housed in the facility overseen by the administrator at no cost. The disposable
menstrual products shall be available in readily accessible locations and in a manner that
minimizes any stigmatization of the individual seeking such products.
of 3